Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-201
Act, how cited; terms, defined.

Sections 30-201 to 30-209 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Wills Recognition Act (1977).

In the Uniform Wills Recognition Act (1977):

(1) International will means a will executed in conformity with sections 30-202 to 30-205; and

(2) Authorized person and person authorized to act in connection with international wills mean a person who by section 30-209, or by the laws of the United States including members of the diplomatic and consular service of the United States designated by Foreign Service Regulations, is empowered to supervise the execution of international wills.

Laws 2020, LB966, § 1.